Illinois, session 104th, HB1203.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 201 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/201)7    Sec. 201. Tax imposed. 8    (a) In general. A tax measured by net income is hereby 9imposed on every individual, corporation, trust and estate for 10each taxable year ending after July 31, 1969 on the privilege 11of earning or receiving income in or as a resident of this 12State. Such tax shall be in addition to all other occupation or 13privilege taxes imposed by this State or by any municipal 14corporation or political subdivision thereof.15    (b) Rates. The tax imposed by subsection (a) of this 16Section shall be determined as follows, except as adjusted by 17subsection (d-1):18        (1) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 19    taxable years ending prior to July 1, 1989, an amount 20    equal to 2 1/2% of the taxpayer's net income for the 21    taxable year.22        (2) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 23    taxable years beginning prior to July 1, 1989 and ending   HB1203- 2 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    after June 30, 1989, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 2 2    1/2% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to 3    July 1, 1989, as calculated under Section 202.3, and (ii) 4    3% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 5    30, 1989, as calculated under Section 202.3.6        (3) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 7    taxable years beginning after June 30, 1989, and ending 8    prior to January 1, 2011, an amount equal to 3% of the 9    taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.10        (4) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 11    for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2011, and 12    ending after December 31, 2010, an amount equal to the sum 13    of (i) 3% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior 14    to January 1, 2011, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 15    (ii) 5% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after 16    December 31, 2010, as calculated under Section 202.5.17        (5) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 18    for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, 19    and ending prior to January 1, 2015, an amount equal to 5% 20    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.21        (5.1) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 22    for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2015, and 23    ending after December 31, 2014, an amount equal to the sum 24    of (i) 5% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior 25    to January 1, 2015, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 26    (ii) 3.75% of the taxpayer's net income for the period   HB1203- 3 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    after December 31, 2014, as calculated under Section 2    202.5. 3        (5.2) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 4    for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, 5    and ending prior to July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 3.75% 6    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year. 7        (5.3) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 8    for taxable years beginning prior to July 1, 2017, and 9    ending after June 30, 2017, an amount equal to the sum of 10    (i) 3.75% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 11    prior to July 1, 2017, as calculated under Section 202.5, 12    and (ii) 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 13    after June 30, 2017, as calculated under Section 202.5. 14        (5.4) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 15    for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2017 and 16    ending before January 1, 2025, an amount equal to 4.95% of 17    the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year. 18        (5.5) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 19    for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2025, and 20    ending after December 31, 2024, an amount equal to the sum 21    of (i) 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 22    prior to January 1, 2025, as calculated under Section 23    202.5, and (ii) 4.85% of the taxpayer's net income for the 24    period after December 31, 2024, as calculated under 25    Section 202.5. 26        (5.6) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate,   HB1203- 4 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, 2    an amount equal to 4.85% of the taxpayer's net income for 3    the taxable year. 4        (6) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 5    ending prior to July 1, 1989, an amount equal to 4% of the 6    taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.7        (7) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 8    beginning prior to July 1, 1989 and ending after June 30, 9    1989, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 4% of the 10    taxpayer's net income for the period prior to July 1, 11    1989, as calculated under Section 202.3, and (ii) 4.8% of 12    the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 30, 13    1989, as calculated under Section 202.3.14        (8) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 15    beginning after June 30, 1989, and ending prior to January 16    1, 2011, an amount equal to 4.8% of the taxpayer's net 17    income for the taxable year.18        (9) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 19    beginning prior to January 1, 2011, and ending after 20    December 31, 2010, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 4.8% 21    of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to 22    January 1, 2011, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 23    (ii) 7% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after 24    December 31, 2010, as calculated under Section 202.5. 25        (10) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 26    beginning on or after January 1, 2011, and ending prior to   HB1203- 5 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    January 1, 2015, an amount equal to 7% of the taxpayer's 2    net income for the taxable year. 3        (11) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 4    beginning prior to January 1, 2015, and ending after 5    December 31, 2014, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 7% of 6    the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to January 7    1, 2015, as calculated under Section 202.5, and (ii) 5.25% 8    of the taxpayer's net income for the period after December 9    31, 2014, as calculated under Section 202.5. 10        (12) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 11    beginning on or after January 1, 2015, and ending prior to 12    July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 5.25% of the taxpayer's 13    net income for the taxable year. 14        (13) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 15    beginning prior to July 1, 2017, and ending after June 30, 16    2017, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 5.25% of the 17    taxpayer's net income for the period prior to July 1, 18    2017, as calculated under Section 202.5, and (ii) 7% of 19    the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 30, 20    2017, as calculated under Section 202.5. 21        (14) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 22    beginning on or after July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 7% 23    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year. 24    The rates under this subsection (b) are subject to the 25provisions of Section 201.5. 26    (b-5) Surcharge; sale or exchange of assets, properties,   HB1203- 6 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1and intangibles of organization gaming licensees. For each of 2taxable years 2019 through 2027, a surcharge is imposed on all 3taxpayers on income arising from the sale or exchange of 4capital assets, depreciable business property, real property 5used in the trade or business, and Section 197 intangibles (i) 6of an organization licensee under the Illinois Horse Racing 7Act of 1975 and (ii) of an organization gaming licensee under 8the Illinois Gambling Act. The amount of the surcharge is 9equal to the amount of federal income tax liability for the 10taxable year attributable to those sales and exchanges. The 11surcharge imposed shall not apply if: 12        (1) the organization gaming license, organization 13    license, or racetrack property is transferred as a result 14    of any of the following:15            (A) bankruptcy, a receivership, or a debt 16        adjustment initiated by or against the initial 17        licensee or the substantial owners of the initial 18        licensee;19            (B) cancellation, revocation, or termination of 20        any such license by the Illinois Gaming Board or the 21        Illinois Racing Board;22            (C) a determination by the Illinois Gaming Board 23        that transfer of the license is in the best interests 24        of Illinois gaming;25            (D) the death of an owner of the equity interest in 26        a licensee;  HB1203- 7 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1            (E) the acquisition of a controlling interest in 2        the stock or substantially all of the assets of a 3        publicly traded company;4            (F) a transfer by a parent company to a wholly 5        owned subsidiary; or6            (G) the transfer or sale to or by one person to 7        another person where both persons were initial owners 8        of the license when the license was issued; or 9        (2) the controlling interest in the organization 10    gaming license, organization license, or racetrack 11    property is transferred in a transaction to lineal 12    descendants in which no gain or loss is recognized or as a 13    result of a transaction in accordance with Section 351 of 14    the Internal Revenue Code in which no gain or loss is 15    recognized; or16        (3) live horse racing was not conducted in 2010 at a 17    racetrack located within 3 miles of the Mississippi River 18    under a license issued pursuant to the Illinois Horse 19    Racing Act of 1975. 20    The transfer of an organization gaming license, 21organization license, or racetrack property by a person other 22than the initial licensee to receive the organization gaming 23license is not subject to a surcharge. The Department shall 24adopt rules necessary to implement and administer this 25subsection. 26    (c) Personal Property Tax Replacement Income Tax.   HB1203- 8 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1Beginning on July 1, 1979 and thereafter, in addition to such 2income tax, there is also hereby imposed the Personal Property 3Tax Replacement Income Tax measured by net income on every 4corporation (including Subchapter S corporations), partnership 5and trust, for each taxable year ending after June 30, 1979. 6Such taxes are imposed on the privilege of earning or 7receiving income in or as a resident of this State. The 8Personal Property Tax Replacement Income Tax shall be in 9addition to the income tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 10of this Section and in addition to all other occupation or 11privilege taxes imposed by this State or by any municipal 12corporation or political subdivision thereof.13    (d) Additional Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 14Tax Rates. The personal property tax replacement income tax 15imposed by this subsection and subsection (c) of this Section 16in the case of a corporation, other than a Subchapter S 17corporation and except as adjusted by subsection (d-1), shall 18be an additional amount equal to 2.85% of such taxpayer's net 19income for the taxable year, except that beginning on January 201, 1981, and thereafter, the rate of 2.85% specified in this 21subsection shall be reduced to 2.5%, and in the case of a 22partnership, trust or a Subchapter S corporation shall be an 23additional amount equal to 1.5% of such taxpayer's net income 24for the taxable year.25    (d-1) Rate reduction for certain foreign insurers. In the 26case of a foreign insurer, as defined by Section 35A-5 of the   HB1203- 9 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1Illinois Insurance Code, whose state or country of domicile 2imposes on insurers domiciled in Illinois a retaliatory tax 3(excluding any insurer whose premiums from reinsurance assumed 4are 50% or more of its total insurance premiums as determined 5under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 304, except 6that for purposes of this determination premiums from 7reinsurance do not include premiums from inter-affiliate 8reinsurance arrangements), beginning with taxable years ending 9on or after December 31, 1999, the sum of the rates of tax 10imposed by subsections (b) and (d) shall be reduced (but not 11increased) to the rate at which the total amount of tax imposed 12under this Act, net of all credits allowed under this Act, 13shall equal (i) the total amount of tax that would be imposed 14on the foreign insurer's net income allocable to Illinois for 15the taxable year by such foreign insurer's state or country of 16domicile if that net income were subject to all income taxes 17and taxes measured by net income imposed by such foreign 18insurer's state or country of domicile, net of all credits 19allowed or (ii) a rate of zero if no such tax is imposed on 20such income by the foreign insurer's state of domicile. For 21the purposes of this subsection (d-1), an inter-affiliate 22includes a mutual insurer under common management.23        (1) For the purposes of subsection (d-1), in no event 24    shall the sum of the rates of tax imposed by subsections 25    (b) and (d) be reduced below the rate at which the sum of:26            (A) the total amount of tax imposed on such   HB1203- 10 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1        foreign insurer under this Act for a taxable year, net 2        of all credits allowed under this Act, plus3            (B) the privilege tax imposed by Section 409 of 4        the Illinois Insurance Code, the fire insurance 5        company tax imposed by Section 12 of the Fire 6        Investigation Act, and the fire department taxes 7        imposed under Section 11-10-1 of the Illinois 8        Municipal Code,9    equals 1.25% for taxable years ending prior to December 10    31, 2003, or 1.75% for taxable years ending on or after 11    December 31, 2003, of the net taxable premiums written for 12    the taxable year, as described by subsection (1) of 13    Section 409 of the Illinois Insurance Code. This paragraph 14    will in no event increase the rates imposed under 15    subsections (b) and (d).16        (2) Any reduction in the rates of tax imposed by this 17    subsection shall be applied first against the rates 18    imposed by subsection (b) and only after the tax imposed 19    by subsection (a) net of all credits allowed under this 20    Section other than the credit allowed under subsection (i) 21    has been reduced to zero, against the rates imposed by 22    subsection (d).23    This subsection (d-1) is exempt from the provisions of 24Section 250.25    (e) Investment credit. A taxpayer shall be allowed a 26credit against the Personal Property Tax Replacement Income   HB1203- 11 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1Tax for investment in qualified property.2        (1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit equal to .5% 3    of the basis of qualified property placed in service 4    during the taxable year, provided such property is placed 5    in service on or after July 1, 1984. There shall be allowed 6    an additional credit equal to .5% of the basis of 7    qualified property placed in service during the taxable 8    year, provided such property is placed in service on or 9    after July 1, 1986, and the taxpayer's base employment 10    within Illinois has increased by 1% or more over the 11    preceding year as determined by the taxpayer's employment 12    records filed with the Illinois Department of Employment 13    Security. Taxpayers who are new to Illinois shall be 14    deemed to have met the 1% growth in base employment for the 15    first year in which they file employment records with the 16    Illinois Department of Employment Security. The provisions 17    added to this Section by Public Act 85-1200 (and restored 18    by Public Act 87-895) shall be construed as declaratory of 19    existing law and not as a new enactment. If, in any year, 20    the increase in base employment within Illinois over the 21    preceding year is less than 1%, the additional credit 22    shall be limited to that percentage times a fraction, the 23    numerator of which is .5% and the denominator of which is 24    1%, but shall not exceed .5%. The investment credit shall 25    not be allowed to the extent that it would reduce a 26    taxpayer's liability in any tax year below zero, nor may   HB1203- 12 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    any credit for qualified property be allowed for any year 2    other than the year in which the property was placed in 3    service in Illinois. For tax years ending on or after 4    December 31, 1987, and on or before December 31, 1988, the 5    credit shall be allowed for the tax year in which the 6    property is placed in service, or, if the amount of the 7    credit exceeds the tax liability for that year, whether it 8    exceeds the original liability or the liability as later 9    amended, such excess may be carried forward and applied to 10    the tax liability of the 5 taxable years following the 11    excess credit years if the taxpayer (i) makes investments 12    which cause the creation of a minimum of 2,000 full-time 13    equivalent jobs in Illinois, (ii) is located in an 14    enterprise zone established pursuant to the Illinois 15    Enterprise Zone Act and (iii) is certified by the 16    Department of Commerce and Community Affairs (now 17    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity) as 18    complying with the requirements specified in clause (i) 19    and (ii) by July 1, 1986. The Department of Commerce and 20    Community Affairs (now Department of Commerce and Economic 21    Opportunity) shall notify the Department of Revenue of all 22    such certifications immediately. For tax years ending 23    after December 31, 1988, the credit shall be allowed for 24    the tax year in which the property is placed in service, 25    or, if the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability 26    for that year, whether it exceeds the original liability   HB1203- 13 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    or the liability as later amended, such excess may be 2    carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 3    taxable years following the excess credit years. The 4    credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which 5    there is a liability. If there is credit from more than one 6    tax year that is available to offset a liability, earlier 7    credit shall be applied first.8        (2) The term "qualified property" means property 9    which:10            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including 11        buildings and structural components of buildings and 12        signs that are real property, but not including land 13        or improvements to real property that are not a 14        structural component of a building such as 15        landscaping, sewer lines, local access roads, fencing, 16        parking lots, and other appurtenances;17            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 19        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 20        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 21        (e);22            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 23        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;24            (D) is used in Illinois by a taxpayer who is 25        primarily engaged in manufacturing, or in mining coal 26        or fluorite, or in retailing, or was placed in service   HB1203- 14 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1        on or after July 1, 2006 in a River Edge Redevelopment 2        Zone established pursuant to the River Edge 3        Redevelopment Zone Act; and4            (E) has not previously been used in Illinois in 5        such a manner and by such a person as would qualify for 6        the credit provided by this subsection (e) or 7        subsection (f).8        (3) For purposes of this subsection (e), 9    "manufacturing" means the material staging and production 10    of tangible personal property by procedures commonly 11    regarded as manufacturing, processing, fabrication, or 12    assembling which changes some existing material into new 13    shapes, new qualities, or new combinations. For purposes 14    of this subsection (e) the term "mining" shall have the 15    same meaning as the term "mining" in Section 613(c) of the 16    Internal Revenue Code. For purposes of this subsection 17    (e), the term "retailing" means the sale of tangible 18    personal property for use or consumption and not for 19    resale, or services rendered in conjunction with the sale 20    of tangible personal property for use or consumption and 21    not for resale. For purposes of this subsection (e), 22    "tangible personal property" has the same meaning as when 23    that term is used in the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 24    and, for taxable years ending after December 31, 2008, 25    does not include the generation, transmission, or 26    distribution of electricity.  HB1203- 15 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1        (4) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 2    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 3    income tax purposes.4        (5) If the basis of the property for federal income 5    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 6    placed in service in Illinois by the taxpayer, the amount 7    of such increase shall be deemed property placed in 8    service on the date of such increase in basis.9        (6) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 10    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.11        (7) If during any taxable year, any property ceases to 12    be qualified property in the hands of the taxpayer within 13    48 months after being placed in service, or the situs of 14    any qualified property is moved outside Illinois within 48 15    months after being placed in service, the Personal 16    Property Tax Replacement Income Tax for such taxable year 17    shall be increased. Such increase shall be determined by 18    (i) recomputing the investment credit which would have 19    been allowed for the year in which credit for such 20    property was originally allowed by eliminating such 21    property from such computation and, (ii) subtracting such 22    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 23    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (7), a 24    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 25    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 26    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent   HB1203- 16 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    of such reduction.2        (8) Unless the investment credit is extended by law, 3    the basis of qualified property shall not include costs 4    incurred after December 31, 2018, except for costs 5    incurred pursuant to a binding contract entered into on or 6    before December 31, 2018.7        (9) Each taxable year ending before December 31, 2000, 8    a partnership may elect to pass through to its partners 9    the credits to which the partnership is entitled under 10    this subsection (e) for the taxable year. A partner may 11    use the credit allocated to him or her under this 12    paragraph only against the tax imposed in subsections (c) 13    and (d) of this Section. If the partnership makes that 14    election, those credits shall be allocated among the 15    partners in the partnership in accordance with the rules 16    set forth in Section 704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, 17    and the rules promulgated under that Section, and the 18    allocated amount of the credits shall be allowed to the 19    partners for that taxable year. The partnership shall make 20    this election on its Personal Property Tax Replacement 21    Income Tax return for that taxable year. The election to 22    pass through the credits shall be irrevocable.23        For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 24    2000, a partner that qualifies its partnership for a 25    subtraction under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (2) of 26    subsection (d) of Section 203 or a shareholder that   HB1203- 17 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    qualifies a Subchapter S corporation for a subtraction 2    under subparagraph (S) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) 3    of Section 203 shall be allowed a credit under this 4    subsection (e) equal to its share of the credit earned 5    under this subsection (e) during the taxable year by the 6    partnership or Subchapter S corporation, determined in 7    accordance with the determination of income and 8    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 9    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. This 10    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 250.11    (f) Investment credit; Enterprise Zone; River Edge 12Redevelopment Zone.13        (1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the 14    tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for 15    investment in qualified property which is placed in 16    service in an Enterprise Zone created pursuant to the 17    Illinois Enterprise Zone Act or, for property placed in 18    service on or after July 1, 2006, a River Edge 19    Redevelopment Zone established pursuant to the River Edge 20    Redevelopment Zone Act. For partners, shareholders of 21    Subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability 22    companies, if the liability company is treated as a 23    partnership for purposes of federal and State income 24    taxation, for taxable years ending before December 31, 25    2023, there shall be allowed a credit under this 26    subsection (f) to be determined in accordance with the   HB1203- 18 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    determination of income and distributive share of income 2    under Sections 702 and 704 and Subchapter S of the 3    Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years ending on or 4    after December 31, 2023, for partners and shareholders of 5    Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of Section 251 6    shall apply with respect to the credit under this 7    subsection. The credit shall be .5% of the basis for such 8    property. The credit shall be available only in the 9    taxable year in which the property is placed in service in 10    the Enterprise Zone or River Edge Redevelopment Zone and 11    shall not be allowed to the extent that it would reduce a 12    taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by subsections 13    (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. For tax years 14    ending on or after December 31, 1985, the credit shall be 15    allowed for the tax year in which the property is placed in 16    service, or, if the amount of the credit exceeds the tax 17    liability for that year, whether it exceeds the original 18    liability or the liability as later amended, such excess 19    may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of 20    the 5 taxable years following the excess credit year. The 21    credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which 22    there is a liability. If there is credit from more than one 23    tax year that is available to offset a liability, the 24    credit accruing first in time shall be applied first.25        (2) The term qualified property means property which:26            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including   HB1203- 19 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1        buildings and structural components of buildings;2            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 3        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 4        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 5        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 6        (f);7            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 8        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;9            (D) is used in the Enterprise Zone or River Edge 10        Redevelopment Zone by the taxpayer; and11            (E) has not been previously used in Illinois in 12        such a manner and by such a person as would qualify for 13        the credit provided by this subsection (f) or 14        subsection (e).15        (3) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 16    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 17    income tax purposes.18        (4) If the basis of the property for federal income 19    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 20    placed in service in the Enterprise Zone or River Edge 21    Redevelopment Zone by the taxpayer, the amount of such 22    increase shall be deemed property placed in service on the 23    date of such increase in basis.24        (5) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 25    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.26        (6) If during any taxable year, any property ceases to   HB1203- 20 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    be qualified property in the hands of the taxpayer within 2    48 months after being placed in service, or the situs of 3    any qualified property is moved outside the Enterprise 4    Zone or River Edge Redevelopment Zone within 48 months 5    after being placed in service, the tax imposed under 6    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for such taxable 7    year shall be increased. Such increase shall be determined 8    by (i) recomputing the investment credit which would have 9    been allowed for the year in which credit for such 10    property was originally allowed by eliminating such 11    property from such computation, and (ii) subtracting such 12    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 13    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (6), a 14    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 15    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 16    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 17    of such reduction.18        (7) There shall be allowed an additional credit equal 19    to 0.5% of the basis of qualified property placed in 20    service during the taxable year in a River Edge 21    Redevelopment Zone, provided such property is placed in 22    service on or after July 1, 2006, and the taxpayer's base 23    employment within Illinois has increased by 1% or more 24    over the preceding year as determined by the taxpayer's 25    employment records filed with the Illinois Department of 26    Employment Security. Taxpayers who are new to Illinois   HB1203- 21 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    shall be deemed to have met the 1% growth in base 2    employment for the first year in which they file 3    employment records with the Illinois Department of 4    Employment Security. If, in any year, the increase in base 5    employment within Illinois over the preceding year is less 6    than 1%, the additional credit shall be limited to that 7    percentage times a fraction, the numerator of which is 8    0.5% and the denominator of which is 1%, but shall not 9    exceed 0.5%. 10        (8) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 11    2021, there shall be allowed an Enterprise Zone 12    construction jobs credit against the taxes imposed under 13    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section as provided in 14    Section 13 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 15        The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 16    liability to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or 17    credits exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the excess may 18    be carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's 19    liability in succeeding calendar years in the same manner 20    provided under paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. 21    The credit or credits shall be applied to the earliest 22    year for which there is a tax liability. If there are 23    credits from more than one taxable year that are available 24    to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be applied 25    first. 26        For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S   HB1203- 22 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    corporations, and owners of limited liability companies, 2    if the liability company is treated as a partnership for 3    the purposes of federal and State income taxation, for 4    taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, there shall 5    be allowed a credit under this Section to be determined in 6    accordance with the determination of income and 7    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 8    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable 9    years ending on or after December 31, 2023, for partners 10    and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the 11    provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 12    credit under this subsection.13        The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under 14    the Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) 15    shall not exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 16        This paragraph (8) is exempt from the provisions of 17    Section 250. 18    (g) (Blank).19    (h) Investment credit; High Impact Business.20        (1) Subject to subsections (b) and (b-5) of Section 21    5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, a taxpayer shall 22    be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 23    (a) and (b) of this Section for investment in qualified 24    property which is placed in service by a Department of 25    Commerce and Economic Opportunity designated High Impact 26    Business. The credit shall be .5% of the basis for such   HB1203- 23 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    property. The credit shall not be available (i) until the 2    minimum investments in qualified property set forth in 3    subdivision (a)(3)(A) of Section 5.5 of the Illinois 4    Enterprise Zone Act have been satisfied or (ii) until the 5    time authorized in subsection (b-5) of the Illinois 6    Enterprise Zone Act for entities designated as High Impact 7    Businesses under subdivisions (a)(3)(B), (a)(3)(C), and 8    (a)(3)(D) of Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 9    Act, and shall not be allowed to the extent that it would 10    reduce a taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by 11    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. The 12    credit applicable to such investments shall be taken in 13    the taxable year in which such investments have been 14    completed. The credit for additional investments beyond 15    the minimum investment by a designated high impact 16    business authorized under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of Section 17    5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act shall be available 18    only in the taxable year in which the property is placed in 19    service and shall not be allowed to the extent that it 20    would reduce a taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by 21    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. For 22    tax years ending on or after December 31, 1987, the credit 23    shall be allowed for the tax year in which the property is 24    placed in service, or, if the amount of the credit exceeds 25    the tax liability for that year, whether it exceeds the 26    original liability or the liability as later amended, such   HB1203- 24 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    excess may be carried forward and applied to the tax 2    liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess 3    credit year. The credit shall be applied to the earliest 4    year for which there is a liability. If there is credit 5    from more than one tax year that is available to offset a 6    liability, the credit accruing first in time shall be 7    applied first.8        Changes made in this subdivision (h)(1) by Public Act 9    88-670 restore changes made by Public Act 85-1182 and 10    reflect existing law.11        (2) The term qualified property means property which:12            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including 13        buildings and structural components of buildings;14            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 15        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 16        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 17        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 18        (h);19            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 20        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code; and21            (D) is not eligible for the Enterprise Zone 22        Investment Credit provided by subsection (f) of this 23        Section.24        (3) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 25    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 26    income tax purposes.  HB1203- 25 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1        (4) If the basis of the property for federal income 2    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 3    placed in service in a federally designated Foreign Trade 4    Zone or Sub-Zone located in Illinois by the taxpayer, the 5    amount of such increase shall be deemed property placed in 6    service on the date of such increase in basis.7        (5) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 8    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.9        (6) If during any taxable year ending on or before 10    December 31, 1996, any property ceases to be qualified 11    property in the hands of the taxpayer within 48 months 12    after being placed in service, or the situs of any 13    qualified property is moved outside Illinois within 48 14    months after being placed in service, the tax imposed 15    under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for such 16    taxable year shall be increased. Such increase shall be 17    determined by (i) recomputing the investment credit which 18    would have been allowed for the year in which credit for 19    such property was originally allowed by eliminating such 20    property from such computation, and (ii) subtracting such 21    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 22    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (6), a 23    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 24    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 25    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 26    of such reduction.  HB1203- 26 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1        (7) Beginning with tax years ending after December 31, 2    1996, if a taxpayer qualifies for the credit under this 3    subsection (h) and thereby is granted a tax abatement and 4    the taxpayer relocates its entire facility in violation of 5    the explicit terms and length of the contract under 6    Section 18-183 of the Property Tax Code, the tax imposed 7    under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section shall be 8    increased for the taxable year in which the taxpayer 9    relocated its facility by an amount equal to the amount of 10    credit received by the taxpayer under this subsection (h).11    (h-5) High Impact Business construction jobs credit. For 12taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, there 13shall also be allowed a High Impact Business construction jobs 14credit against the tax imposed under subsections (a) and (b) 15of this Section as provided in subsections (i) and (j) of 16Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 17    The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 18liability to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or 19credits exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the excess may be 20carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's liability 21in succeeding calendar years in the manner provided under 22paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. The credit or credits 23shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 24liability. If there are credits from more than one taxable 25year that are available to offset a liability, the earlier 26credit shall be applied first.   HB1203- 27 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, 2and owners of limited liability companies, for taxable years 3ending before December 31, 2023, if the liability company is 4treated as a partnership for the purposes of federal and State 5income taxation, there shall be allowed a credit under this 6Section to be determined in accordance with the determination 7of income and distributive share of income under Sections 702 8and 704 and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For 9taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2023, for 10partners and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the 11provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 12credit under this subsection.13    The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under the 14Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) shall not 15exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 16    This subsection (h-5) is exempt from the provisions of 17Section 250. 18    (i) Credit for Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 19Tax. For tax years ending prior to December 31, 2003, a credit 20shall be allowed against the tax imposed by subsections (a) 21and (b) of this Section for the tax imposed by subsections (c) 22and (d) of this Section. This credit shall be computed by 23multiplying the tax imposed by subsections (c) and (d) of this 24Section by a fraction, the numerator of which is base income 25allocable to Illinois and the denominator of which is Illinois 26base income, and further multiplying the product by the tax   HB1203- 28 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1rate imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section.2    Any credit earned on or after December 31, 1986 under this 3subsection which is unused in the year the credit is computed 4because it exceeds the tax liability imposed by subsections 5(a) and (b) for that year (whether it exceeds the original 6liability or the liability as later amended) may be carried 7forward and applied to the tax liability imposed by 8subsections (a) and (b) of the 5 taxable years following the 9excess credit year, provided that no credit may be carried 10forward to any year ending on or after December 31, 2003. This 11credit shall be applied first to the earliest year for which 12there is a liability. If there is a credit under this 13subsection from more than one tax year that is available to 14offset a liability the earliest credit arising under this 15subsection shall be applied first.16    If, during any taxable year ending on or after December 1731, 1986, the tax imposed by subsections (c) and (d) of this 18Section for which a taxpayer has claimed a credit under this 19subsection (i) is reduced, the amount of credit for such tax 20shall also be reduced. Such reduction shall be determined by 21recomputing the credit to take into account the reduced tax 22imposed by subsections (c) and (d). If any portion of the 23reduced amount of credit has been carried to a different 24taxable year, an amended return shall be filed for such 25taxable year to reduce the amount of credit claimed.26    (j) Training expense credit. Beginning with tax years   HB1203- 29 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1ending on or after December 31, 1986 and prior to December 31, 22003, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 3imposed by subsections (a) and (b) under this Section for all 4amounts paid or accrued, on behalf of all persons employed by 5the taxpayer in Illinois or Illinois residents employed 6outside of Illinois by a taxpayer, for educational or 7vocational training in semi-technical or technical fields or 8semi-skilled or skilled fields, which were deducted from gross 9income in the computation of taxable income. The credit 10against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) shall be 111.6% of such training expenses. For partners, shareholders of 12subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability 13companies, if the liability company is treated as a 14partnership for purposes of federal and State income taxation, 15for taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, there shall 16be allowed a credit under this subsection (j) to be determined 17in accordance with the determination of income and 18distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 and 19subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years 20ending on or after December 31, 2023, for partners and 21shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of 22Section 251 shall apply with respect to the credit under this 23subsection.24    Any credit allowed under this subsection which is unused 25in the year the credit is earned may be carried forward to each 26of the 5 taxable years following the year for which the credit   HB1203- 30 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1is first computed until it is used. This credit shall be 2applied first to the earliest year for which there is a 3liability. If there is a credit under this subsection from 4more than one tax year that is available to offset a liability, 5the earliest credit arising under this subsection shall be 6applied first. No carryforward credit may be claimed in any 7tax year ending on or after December 31, 2003.8    (k) Research and development credit. For tax years ending 9after July 1, 1990 and prior to December 31, 2003, and 10beginning again for tax years ending on or after December 31, 112004, and ending prior to January 1, 2032, a taxpayer shall be 12allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) 13and (b) of this Section for increasing research activities in 14this State. The credit allowed against the tax imposed by 15subsections (a) and (b) shall be equal to 6 1/2% of the 16qualifying expenditures for increasing research activities in 17this State. For partners, shareholders of subchapter S 18corporations, and owners of limited liability companies, if 19the liability company is treated as a partnership for purposes 20of federal and State income taxation, for taxable years ending 21before December 31, 2023, there shall be allowed a credit 22under this subsection to be determined in accordance with the 23determination of income and distributive share of income under 24Sections 702 and 704 and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue 25Code. For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2023, 26for partners and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations,   HB1203- 31 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1the provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 2credit under this subsection.3    For purposes of this subsection, "qualifying expenditures" 4means the qualifying expenditures as defined for the federal 5credit for increasing research activities which would be 6allowable under Section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code and 7which are conducted in this State, "qualifying expenditures 8for increasing research activities in this State" means the 9excess of qualifying expenditures for the taxable year in 10which incurred over qualifying expenditures for the base 11period, "qualifying expenditures for the base period" means 12the average of the qualifying expenditures for each year in 13the base period, and "base period" means the 3 taxable years 14immediately preceding the taxable year for which the 15determination is being made.16    Any credit in excess of the tax liability for the taxable 17year may be carried forward. A taxpayer may elect to have the 18unused credit shown on its final completed return carried over 19as a credit against the tax liability for the following 5 20taxable years or until it has been fully used, whichever 21occurs first; provided that no credit earned in a tax year 22ending prior to December 31, 2003 may be carried forward to any 23year ending on or after December 31, 2003.24    If an unused credit is carried forward to a given year from 252 or more earlier years, that credit arising in the earliest 26year will be applied first against the tax liability for the   HB1203- 32 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1given year. If a tax liability for the given year still 2remains, the credit from the next earliest year will then be 3applied, and so on, until all credits have been used or no tax 4liability for the given year remains. Any remaining unused 5credit or credits then will be carried forward to the next 6following year in which a tax liability is incurred, except 7that no credit can be carried forward to a year which is more 8than 5 years after the year in which the expense for which the 9credit is given was incurred.10    No inference shall be drawn from Public Act 91-644 in 11construing this Section for taxable years beginning before 12January 1, 1999.13    It is the intent of the General Assembly that the research 14and development credit under this subsection (k) shall apply 15continuously for all tax years ending on or after December 31, 162004 and ending prior to January 1, 2032, including, but not 17limited to, the period beginning on January 1, 2016 and ending 18on July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 100-22). All 19actions taken in reliance on the continuation of the credit 20under this subsection (k) by any taxpayer are hereby 21validated. 22    (l) Environmental Remediation Tax Credit.23        (i) For tax years ending after December 31, 1997 and 24    on or before December 31, 2001, a taxpayer shall be 25    allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 26    (a) and (b) of this Section for certain amounts paid for   HB1203- 33 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    unreimbursed eligible remediation costs, as specified in 2    this subsection. For purposes of this Section, 3    "unreimbursed eligible remediation costs" means costs 4    approved by the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 5    ("Agency") under Section 58.14 of the Environmental 6    Protection Act that were paid in performing environmental 7    remediation at a site for which a No Further Remediation 8    Letter was issued by the Agency and recorded under Section 9    58.10 of the Environmental Protection Act. The credit must 10    be claimed for the taxable year in which Agency approval 11    of the eligible remediation costs is granted. The credit 12    is not available to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or any 13    related party caused or contributed to, in any material 14    respect, a release of regulated substances on, in, or 15    under the site that was identified and addressed by the 16    remedial action pursuant to the Site Remediation Program 17    of the Environmental Protection Act. After the Pollution 18    Control Board rules are adopted pursuant to the Illinois 19    Administrative Procedure Act for the administration and 20    enforcement of Section 58.9 of the Environmental 21    Protection Act, determinations as to credit availability 22    for purposes of this Section shall be made consistent with 23    those rules. For purposes of this Section, "taxpayer" 24    includes a person whose tax attributes the taxpayer has 25    succeeded to under Section 381 of the Internal Revenue 26    Code and "related party" includes the persons disallowed a   HB1203- 34 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    deduction for losses by paragraphs (b), (c), and (f)(1) of 2    Section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code by virtue of 3    being a related taxpayer, as well as any of its partners. 4    The credit allowed against the tax imposed by subsections 5    (a) and (b) shall be equal to 25% of the unreimbursed 6    eligible remediation costs in excess of $100,000 per site, 7    except that the $100,000 threshold shall not apply to any 8    site contained in an enterprise zone as determined by the 9    Department of Commerce and Community Affairs (now 10    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity). The 11    total credit allowed shall not exceed $40,000 per year 12    with a maximum total of $150,000 per site. For partners 13    and shareholders of subchapter S corporations, there shall 14    be allowed a credit under this subsection to be determined 15    in accordance with the determination of income and 16    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 17    and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code.18        (ii) A credit allowed under this subsection that is 19    unused in the year the credit is earned may be carried 20    forward to each of the 5 taxable years following the year 21    for which the credit is first earned until it is used. The 22    term "unused credit" does not include any amounts of 23    unreimbursed eligible remediation costs in excess of the 24    maximum credit per site authorized under paragraph (i). 25    This credit shall be applied first to the earliest year 26    for which there is a liability. If there is a credit under   HB1203- 35 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    this subsection from more than one tax year that is 2    available to offset a liability, the earliest credit 3    arising under this subsection shall be applied first. A 4    credit allowed under this subsection may be sold to a 5    buyer as part of a sale of all or part of the remediation 6    site for which the credit was granted. The purchaser of a 7    remediation site and the tax credit shall succeed to the 8    unused credit and remaining carry-forward period of the 9    seller. To perfect the transfer, the assignor shall record 10    the transfer in the chain of title for the site and provide 11    written notice to the Director of the Illinois Department 12    of Revenue of the assignor's intent to sell the 13    remediation site and the amount of the tax credit to be 14    transferred as a portion of the sale. In no event may a 15    credit be transferred to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or a 16    related party would not be eligible under the provisions 17    of subsection (i).18        (iii) For purposes of this Section, the term "site" 19    shall have the same meaning as under Section 58.2 of the 20    Environmental Protection Act.21    (m) Education expense credit. Beginning with tax years 22ending after December 31, 1999, a taxpayer who is the 23custodian of one or more qualifying pupils shall be allowed a 24credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 25this Section for qualified education expenses incurred on 26behalf of the qualifying pupils. The credit shall be equal to   HB1203- 36 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b125% of qualified education expenses, but in no event may the 2total credit under this subsection claimed by a family that is 3the custodian of qualifying pupils exceed (i) $500 for tax 4years ending prior to December 31, 2017, and (ii) $750 for tax 5years ending on or after December 31, 2017. In no event shall a 6credit under this subsection reduce the taxpayer's liability 7under this Act to less than zero. Notwithstanding any other 8provision of law, for taxable years beginning on or after 9January 1, 2017, no taxpayer may claim a credit under this 10subsection (m) if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the 11taxable year exceeds (i) $500,000, in the case of spouses 12filing a joint federal tax return or (ii) $250,000, in the case 13of all other taxpayers. This subsection is exempt from the 14provisions of Section 250 of this Act.15    For purposes of this subsection:16    "Qualifying pupils" means individuals who (i) are 17residents of the State of Illinois, (ii) are under the age of 1821 at the close of the school year for which a credit is 19sought, and (iii) during the school year for which a credit is 20sought were full-time pupils enrolled in a kindergarten 21through twelfth grade education program at any school, as 22defined in this subsection.23    "Qualified education expense" means the amount incurred on 24behalf of a qualifying pupil in excess of $250 for tuition, 25book fees, and lab fees at the school in which the pupil is 26enrolled during the regular school year.  HB1203- 37 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    "School" means any public or nonpublic elementary or 2secondary school in Illinois that is in compliance with Title 3VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and attendance at which 4satisfies the requirements of Section 26-1 of the School Code, 5except that nothing shall be construed to require a child to 6attend any particular public or nonpublic school to qualify 7for the credit under this Section.8    "Custodian" means, with respect to qualifying pupils, an 9Illinois resident who is a parent, the parents, a legal 10guardian, or the legal guardians of the qualifying pupils.11    (n) River Edge Redevelopment Zone site remediation tax 12credit. 13        (i) For tax years ending on or after December 31, 14    2006, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 15    imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for 16    certain amounts paid for unreimbursed eligible remediation 17    costs, as specified in this subsection. For purposes of 18    this Section, "unreimbursed eligible remediation costs" 19    means costs approved by the Illinois Environmental 20    Protection Agency ("Agency") under Section 58.14a of the 21    Environmental Protection Act that were paid in performing 22    environmental remediation at a site within a River Edge 23    Redevelopment Zone for which a No Further Remediation 24    Letter was issued by the Agency and recorded under Section 25    58.10 of the Environmental Protection Act. The credit must 26    be claimed for the taxable year in which Agency approval   HB1203- 38 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    of the eligible remediation costs is granted. The credit 2    is not available to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or any 3    related party caused or contributed to, in any material 4    respect, a release of regulated substances on, in, or 5    under the site that was identified and addressed by the 6    remedial action pursuant to the Site Remediation Program 7    of the Environmental Protection Act. Determinations as to 8    credit availability for purposes of this Section shall be 9    made consistent with rules adopted by the Pollution 10    Control Board pursuant to the Illinois Administrative 11    Procedure Act for the administration and enforcement of 12    Section 58.9 of the Environmental Protection Act. For 13    purposes of this Section, "taxpayer" includes a person 14    whose tax attributes the taxpayer has succeeded to under 15    Section 381 of the Internal Revenue Code and "related 16    party" includes the persons disallowed a deduction for 17    losses by paragraphs (b), (c), and (f)(1) of Section 267 18    of the Internal Revenue Code by virtue of being a related 19    taxpayer, as well as any of its partners. The credit 20    allowed against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 21    shall be equal to 25% of the unreimbursed eligible 22    remediation costs in excess of $100,000 per site.23        (ii) A credit allowed under this subsection that is 24    unused in the year the credit is earned may be carried 25    forward to each of the 5 taxable years following the year 26    for which the credit is first earned until it is used. This   HB1203- 39 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    credit shall be applied first to the earliest year for 2    which there is a liability. If there is a credit under this 3    subsection from more than one tax year that is available 4    to offset a liability, the earliest credit arising under 5    this subsection shall be applied first. A credit allowed 6    under this subsection may be sold to a buyer as part of a 7    sale of all or part of the remediation site for which the 8    credit was granted. The purchaser of a remediation site 9    and the tax credit shall succeed to the unused credit and 10    remaining carry-forward period of the seller. To perfect 11    the transfer, the assignor shall record the transfer in 12    the chain of title for the site and provide written notice 13    to the Director of the Illinois Department of Revenue of 14    the assignor's intent to sell the remediation site and the 15    amount of the tax credit to be transferred as a portion of 16    the sale. In no event may a credit be transferred to any 17    taxpayer if the taxpayer or a related party would not be 18    eligible under the provisions of subsection (i).19        (iii) For purposes of this Section, the term "site" 20    shall have the same meaning as under Section 58.2 of the 21    Environmental Protection Act.22    (o) For each of taxable years during the Compassionate Use 23of Medical Cannabis Program, a surcharge is imposed on all 24taxpayers on income arising from the sale or exchange of 25capital assets, depreciable business property, real property 26used in the trade or business, and Section 197 intangibles of   HB1203- 40 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1an organization registrant under the Compassionate Use of 2Medical Cannabis Program Act. The amount of the surcharge is 3equal to the amount of federal income tax liability for the 4taxable year attributable to those sales and exchanges. The 5surcharge imposed does not apply if:6        (1) the medical cannabis cultivation center 7    registration, medical cannabis dispensary registration, or 8    the property of a registration is transferred as a result 9    of any of the following:10            (A) bankruptcy, a receivership, or a debt 11        adjustment initiated by or against the initial 12        registration or the substantial owners of the initial 13        registration;14            (B) cancellation, revocation, or termination of 15        any registration by the Illinois Department of Public 16        Health;17            (C) a determination by the Illinois Department of 18        Public Health that transfer of the registration is in 19        the best interests of Illinois qualifying patients as 20        defined by the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 21        Program Act;22            (D) the death of an owner of the equity interest in 23        a registrant;24            (E) the acquisition of a controlling interest in 25        the stock or substantially all of the assets of a 26        publicly traded company;  HB1203- 41 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1            (F) a transfer by a parent company to a wholly 2        owned subsidiary; or3            (G) the transfer or sale to or by one person to 4        another person where both persons were initial owners 5        of the registration when the registration was issued; 6        or7        (2) the cannabis cultivation center registration, 8    medical cannabis dispensary registration, or the 9    controlling interest in a registrant's property is 10    transferred in a transaction to lineal descendants in 11    which no gain or loss is recognized or as a result of a 12    transaction in accordance with Section 351 of the Internal 13    Revenue Code in which no gain or loss is recognized.14    (p) Pass-through entity tax. 15        (1) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 16    2021 and beginning prior to January 1, 2026, a partnership 17    (other than a publicly traded partnership under Section 18    7704 of the Internal Revenue Code) or Subchapter S 19    corporation may elect to apply the provisions of this 20    subsection. A separate election shall be made for each 21    taxable year. Such election shall be made at such time, 22    and in such form and manner as prescribed by the 23    Department, and, once made, is irrevocable. 24        (2) Entity-level tax. A partnership or Subchapter S 25    corporation electing to apply the provisions of this 26    subsection shall be subject to a tax for the privilege of   HB1203- 42 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    earning or receiving income in this State in an amount 2    equal to a percentage 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income 3    for the taxable year. For the purposes of this 4    subparagraph (p), that percentage shall be the tax rate 5    imposed on individuals, trusts, and estates under 6    subsection (b) of this Section. 7        (3) Net income defined. 8            (A) In general. For purposes of paragraph (2), the 9        term net income has the same meaning as defined in 10        Section 202 of this Act, except that, for tax years 11        ending on or after December 31, 2023, a deduction 12        shall be allowed in computing base income for 13        distributions to a retired partner to the extent that 14        the partner's distributions are exempt from tax under 15        Section 203(a)(2)(F) of this Act. In addition, the 16        following modifications shall not apply: 17                (i) the standard exemption allowed under 18            Section 204; 19                (ii) the deduction for net losses allowed 20            under Section 207; 21                (iii) in the case of an S corporation, the 22            modification under Section 203(b)(2)(S); and 23                (iv) in the case of a partnership, the 24            modifications under Section 203(d)(2)(H) and 25            Section 203(d)(2)(I). 26            (B) Special rule for tiered partnerships. If a   HB1203- 43 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1        taxpayer making the election under paragraph (1) is a 2        partner of another taxpayer making the election under 3        paragraph (1), net income shall be computed as 4        provided in subparagraph (A), except that the taxpayer 5        shall subtract its distributive share of the net 6        income of the electing partnership (including its 7        distributive share of the net income of the electing 8        partnership derived as a distributive share from 9        electing partnerships in which it is a partner). 10        (4) Credit for entity level tax. Each partner or 11    shareholder of a taxpayer making the election under this 12    Section shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 13    under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 14    for the taxable year of the partnership or Subchapter S 15    corporation for which an election is in effect ending 16    within or with the taxable year of the partner or 17    shareholder in an amount equal to 4.95% times the partner 18    or shareholder's distributive share of the net income of 19    the electing partnership or Subchapter S corporation, but 20    not to exceed the partner's or shareholder's share of the 21    tax imposed under paragraph (1) which is actually paid by 22    the partnership or Subchapter S corporation. If the 23    taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S corporation that 24    is itself a partner of a partnership making the election 25    under paragraph (1), the credit under this paragraph shall 26    be allowed to the taxpayer's partners or shareholders (or   HB1203- 44 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    if the partner is a partnership or Subchapter S 2    corporation then its partners or shareholders) in 3    accordance with the determination of income and 4    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 5    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. If the 6    amount of the credit allowed under this paragraph exceeds 7    the partner's or shareholder's liability for tax imposed 8    under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 9    for the taxable year, such excess shall be treated as an 10    overpayment for purposes of Section 909 of this Act. 11        (5) Nonresidents. A nonresident individual who is a 12    partner or shareholder of a partnership or Subchapter S 13    corporation for a taxable year for which an election is in 14    effect under paragraph (1) shall not be required to file 15    an income tax return under this Act for such taxable year 16    if the only source of net income of the individual (or the 17    individual and the individual's spouse in the case of a 18    joint return) is from an entity making the election under 19    paragraph (1) and the credit allowed to the partner or 20    shareholder under paragraph (4) equals or exceeds the 21    individual's liability for the tax imposed under 22    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act for the 23    taxable year.24        (6) Liability for tax. Except as provided in this 25    paragraph, a partnership or Subchapter S making the 26    election under paragraph (1) is liable for the   HB1203- 45 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    entity-level tax imposed under paragraph (2). If the 2    electing partnership or corporation fails to pay the full 3    amount of tax deemed assessed under paragraph (2), the 4    partners or shareholders shall be liable to pay the tax 5    assessed (including penalties and interest). Each partner 6    or shareholder shall be liable for the unpaid assessment 7    based on the ratio of the partner's or shareholder's share 8    of the net income of the partnership over the total net 9    income of the partnership. If the partnership or 10    Subchapter S corporation fails to pay the tax assessed 11    (including penalties and interest) and thereafter an 12    amount of such tax is paid by the partners or 13    shareholders, such amount shall not be collected from the 14    partnership or corporation. 15        (7) Foreign tax. For purposes of the credit allowed 16    under Section 601(b)(3) of this Act, tax paid by a 17    partnership or Subchapter S corporation to another state 18    which, as determined by the Department, is substantially 19    similar to the tax imposed under this subsection, shall be 20    considered tax paid by the partner or shareholder to the 21    extent that the partner's or shareholder's share of the 22    income of the partnership or Subchapter S corporation 23    allocated and apportioned to such other state bears to the 24    total income of the partnership or Subchapter S 25    corporation allocated or apportioned to such other state. 26        (8) Suspension of withholding. The provisions of   HB1203- 46 -LRB104 03344 HLH 13366 b1    Section 709.5 of this Act shall not apply to a partnership 2    or Subchapter S corporation for the taxable year for which 3    an election under paragraph (1) is in effect. 4        (9) Requirement to pay estimated tax. For each taxable 5    year for which an election under paragraph (1) is in 6    effect, a partnership or Subchapter S corporation is 7    required to pay estimated tax for such taxable year under 8    Sections 803 and 804 of this Act if the amount payable as 9    estimated tax can reasonably be expected to exceed $500. 10        (10) The provisions of this subsection shall apply 11    only with respect to taxable years for which the 12    limitation on individual deductions applies under Section 13    164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code. 14(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 15103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-396, eff. 1-1-24; 103-595, eff. 166-26-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.